Arkansas, session 2025, SB484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-611(c), concerning the appointment of
an individual to fill a vacancy on a school district board of directors, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If a vacancy occurs on the school district board of directors,
the vacancy shall be filled by the appointment of an individual who is a
qualified elector of the school district and who resides in the same zone, if
applicable, as required by the vacant position by either:
(1)(A) A majority vote of the remaining directors within
ninety (90) days:
(A) Thirty (30) days for vacancies resulting under
subdivisions (a)(1)-(7) of this section; or
(B) Sixty (60) days for vacancies resulting under
subdivision (a)(8) of this section; or
(2)(B) The county quorum court of the county in which a
majority of the residents are represented by the school district board of
*TNL346*
04-01-2025 15:05:18 TNL346

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB484
directors' vacated position if:
(A)(i) As a result of several vacancies on the
school district board of directors, only a minority of board members remains;
or
(B)(ii) The school district board of directors fails
to fill the vacancy within the time permitted under subdivision (c)(1)(A) or
subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section.
(2)(A) At least thirty (30) days before an appointment is made
by a school district board of directors or a county quorum court, the school
district shall publish a notice of the vacancy on the school district board
of directors, the date of the meeting when the appointment shall be made to
fill the vacancy, and the requirements for being considered to fill the
vacancy, including without limitation the process for consideration to fill
the vacancy required under subdivision (c)(3) of this section:
(i) In a local newspaper covering the school
district zone or area;
(ii)(a) On the homepage of the school district's
official website.
(b) The school district shall include blank
copies of any required forms with the notice required under subdivision
(c)(2)(A)(ii)(a) of this section; and
(iii) Utilizing existing communication systems,
including without limitation text messages, phone messages, and email, that
the school district ordinarily employs to contact parents and legal guardians
of students enrolled in the school district.
(B) A school district shall promptly give notice of the
existence of a vacancy and shall submit evidence of the publication of a
vacancy required under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section to the county
clerk of the county in which the school district is administratively
domiciled.
(3) A qualified elector who resides in the school district or
school district zone affected by a school district board of directors'
vacancy who wishes to be considered to fill the vacancy shall submit a
petition to the school district or county quorum court no later than ten (10)
days before the date of the meeting specified in the notice of the vacancy
published under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section that:
04-01-2025 15:05:18 TNL346

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB484
(A) Is signed by at least twenty (20) qualified electors
from the vacant school district or school district zone position; and
(B) States his or her intention to be considered for the
appointment to fill the vacancy.
(4)(A) The school district board of directors or quorum court
shall:
(i) Acknowledge in writing the receipt of a petition
under subdivision (c)(3) of this section; and
(ii) Promptly inform a candidate if his or her
petition has been found to be insufficient or invalid:
(a) That his or her petition has been found to
be insufficient or invalid; and
(b) What the candidate is required to do to
cure the petition before the deadline.
(B) A school district board of directors or county quorum
court may fill a vacancy only with a candidate who has submitted a timely,
valid, and sufficient petition under this section.
(5)(A) An elector who submits a sufficient and valid petition
under this section shall be given at least five (5) minutes to present his or
her candidacy in a public meeting of the remaining members of the school
district board of directors or the county quorum court before either the
school district board of directors or county quorum court votes to fill the
vacancy.
(B) A school district board of directors or a county
quorum court may request reasonable information from a candidate to fill a
vacancy under this section, including without limitation a request for
written answers to questions before a public meeting is held.
(C)(i) A school district board of directors may vote to
decline to fill the vacancy.
(ii) If a school district board of directors votes
to decline to fill a vacancy under subdivision (c)(5)(C)(i) of this section,
the appointment shall pass immediately to the quorum court of the county in
which a majority of the residents of the vacant position reside.
(6) All matters regarding the filling of a vacancy on a school
district board of directors shall be discussed and acted upon by a school
district board of directors or a county quorum court in an open public
04-01-2025 15:05:18 TNL346

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB484
meeting and not in an executive session.
(7) If, after substantially complying with subdivisions (c)(1)–
(6) of this section, a school district board of directors or a quorum court
has not received a valid and sufficient petition under this section, the
school district board of directors or county quorum court may use an
alternative process to fill the vacancy.

/s/Irvin




























04-01-2025 15:05:18 TNL346